South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S752.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-1-460 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-1-460.   (A) The Each school district board of trustees may shall adopt a policy that authorizes a student to be excused from school to attend a class in religious instruction conducted by a private entity if: (1) the student's parent or guardian gives written consent; (2) the sponsoring entity maintains attendance records and makes them available to the public school the student attends; (3) transportation to and from the place of instruction, including transportation for students with disabilities, is the complete responsibility of the sponsoring entity, parent, or guardian; (4) the sponsoring entity makes provisions for and assumes liability for the student who is excused;  and (5) no public funds are expended and no public school personnel are involved in providing the religious instruction. (B) It is the responsibility of a participating student to make up any missed schoolwork. However, no student may be released from a core academic subject class to attend a religious instruction class. While in attendance in a religious instruction class pursuant to this section, a student is not considered to be absent from school. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----